Hawaii statutes.
§706-622.5 Sentencing for drug offenders;
expungement. (1) Notwithstanding section 706-620(3), a person convicted
for the first or second time for any offense under section 329-43.5 involving
the possession or use of drug paraphernalia or any felony offense under part IV
of chapter 712 involving the possession or use of any dangerous drug,
detrimental drug, harmful drug, intoxicating compound, marijuana, or marijuana
concentrate, as defined in section 712‑1240, but not including any
offense under part IV of chapter 712 involving the distribution or manufacture
of any such drugs or substances and not including any methamphetamine offenses
under sections 712‑1240.7, 712‑1240.8 as that section was in effect
prior to July 1, 2016, 712-1241, and 712-1242, is eligible to be sentenced to
probation under subsection (2) if the person meets the following criteria:

(a) The court has determined that the person is
nonviolent after reviewing the person's criminal history, the factual
circumstances of the offense for which the person is being sentenced, and any
other relevant information;

(b) The person has been assessed by a certified
substance abuse counselor to be in need of substance abuse treatment due to
dependency or abuse under the applicable Diagnostic and Statistical Manual and
Addiction Severity Index; and

(c) Except for those persons directed to substance
abuse treatment under the supervision of the drug court, the person presents a
proposal to receive substance abuse treatment in accordance with the treatment
plan prepared by a certified substance abuse counselor through a substance
abuse treatment program that includes an identified source of payment for the
treatment program.

(2) A person eligible under subsection (1) may
be sentenced to probation to undergo and complete a substance abuse treatment
program if the court determines that the person can benefit from substance
abuse treatment and, notwithstanding that the person would be subject to
sentencing as a repeat offender under section 706-606.5, the person should not
be incarcerated to protect the public. If the person fails to complete the
substance abuse treatment program and the court determines that the person
cannot benefit from any other suitable substance abuse treatment program, the
person shall be subject to sentencing under the applicable section under this
part. As a condition of probation under this subsection, the court may direct
the person to undergo and complete substance abuse treatment under the
supervision of the drug court if the person has a history of relapse in
treatment programs. The court may require other terms and conditions of
probation, including requiring that the person contribute to the cost of the
substance abuse treatment program, comply with deadlines for entering into the
substance abuse treatment program, and reside in a secure drug treatment
facility.

(3) For the purposes of this section,
"substance abuse treatment program" means drug or substance abuse
treatment services provided outside a correctional facility by a public,
private, or nonprofit entity that specializes in treating persons who are
diagnosed with having substance abuse or dependency and preferably employs
licensed professionals or certified substance abuse counselors.

(4) Upon written application from a person
sentenced under this part or a probation officer, the court shall issue a court
order to expunge the record of conviction for that particular offense; provided
that a person has successfully completed the substance abuse treatment program
and complied with other terms and conditions of probation. A person sentenced
to probation under this section who has not previously been sentenced under
this section shall be eligible for one time only for expungement under this
subsection.

(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed
to give rise to a cause of action against the State, a state employee, or a
treatment provider. [L 2002, c 161, §3; am L 2004, c 44, §11; am L 2006, c 230,
§18; am L Sp 2009, c 4, §3; am L 2012, c 140, §2; am L 2016, c 231, §21]

COMMENTARY ON §706-622.5

Act 161, Session Laws 2002, added this section to require,
among other things, that first-time nonviolent drug offenders be sentenced to
undergo and complete drug treatment instead of incarceration. The legislature
found that the link between substance abuse and crime is well-established. The
legislature did not wish to diminish the seriousness of crime, but looked to
approaching crime as being the result of addiction that is treatable. The
treatment route was expected to produce a reduction in crime and recidivism.
The legislature intended to promote treatment of nonviolent substance abuse
offenders, rather than incarceration, as being in the best interests of the
individual and the community at large. Conference Committee Report No. 96-02.

Act 230, Session Laws 2006, amended subsection (1) to exclude
the offenses of methamphetamine trafficking in the first and second degrees
from the offenses for which first-time drug offenders may be eligible to be
sentenced to probation.

Act 4, Special Session Laws 2009, amended subsection (2)
authorizing the placement of certain drug offenders in secure drug treatment
facilities, to promote the rehabilitation of convicted drug offenders through
alternatives to incarceration. The legislature found that providing convicted
drug offenders with drug rehabilitation programs in a secure drug treatment
facility would reduce the offenders' rate of recidivism upon release and help
the offenders develop an important and meaningful role in society. Senate
Standing Committee Report No. 1285, Conference Committee Report No. 25.

Act 140, Session Laws 2012, amended this section by:
(1) allowing for the sentence of probation for certain second time drug
offenses; and (2) clarifying that a person sentenced to probation as a first
time drug offender who has not been previously sentenced to probation as a drug
offender shall be eligible for expungement only once. The legislature found
that the rates of crime, victimization, and arrests and felony convictions for
violent and property crimes had declined, while the number of persons
incarcerated or under probation supervision, in some cases, had increased. The
legislature also found that existing law required the courts to impose a prison
sentence for an offender who had a second felony conviction for drug
possession. Act 140 amended the law to allow for second time drug offenders to
be eligible for probation. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 3352,
Conference Committee Report No. 130-12.

Act 231, Session Laws 2016, amended subsections (1) and (4)
to implement recommendations made by the Penal Code Review Committee convened
pursuant to House Concurrent Resolution No. 155, S.D. 1 (2015).

Case Notes

Inasmuch as the plain and unambiguous language of §706-606.5
requires application of the repeat offender statute over "any other law to
the contrary", the circuit court did not err in sentencing defendant as a
repeat offender pursuant to §706-606.5; in all cases in which §706-606.5 is
applicable, including those in which a defendant would otherwise be eligible
for probation under this section, the circuit courts must sentence defendants
pursuant to the provisions of §706-606.5. 103 H. 228, 81 P.3d 408 (2003).

Defendants with prior felony convictions of drug offenses are
disqualified from sentencing pursuant to this section, even if the convictions
occurred in other jurisdictions and therefore not "under part IV of
chapter 712", so long as the offenses would implicate part IV of chapter
712 if committed in Hawaii. 104 H. 71, 85 P.3d 178 (2004).

By its plain language, Act 44, L 2004, prospectively
permitted greater discretion to sentencing courts confronted with conflicts
between this section and §706-606.5 than they previously possessed; thus, based
on the legislative intent reflected in Act 44, the Act 161, L 2002 version of
this section, under which defendant was sentenced, did not trump the repeat
offender statute. 106 H. 1, 100 P.3d 595 (2004).

As section is ameliorative in its intent and effect and its
application would neither be detrimental nor materially disadvantageous to the
defendant, retrospective application of this section as established by Act 161,
L 2002, was not prohibited; where defendant did not qualify as a first-time drug
offender, the trial court did not err in sentencing defendant pursuant to
§712-1243(3) (2002). 107 H. 215, 112 P.3d 69 (2005).

Consistent with §706-625(1), because petitioner, who was
sentenced to probation under subsection (1), had completed petitioner's
probation term and was subsequently discharged and thus "satisfied the
disposition of the court", as provided by §706-630, petitioner had, in
effect, complied with the terms and conditions of probation for purposes of
expungement under subsection (4). 129 H. 363, 300 P.3d 1022 (2013).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next